Illinois, session 104th, SB1621.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Court of Claims Act is amended by changing 5Sections 8 and 11 as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 505/8)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.8)7    Sec. 8. Court of Claims jurisdiction; deliberation 8periods. The court shall have exclusive jurisdiction to hear 9and determine the following matters:10        (a) All claims against the State founded upon any law 11    of the State of Illinois or upon any regulation adopted 12    thereunder by an executive or administrative officer or 13    agency; provided, however, the court shall not have 14    jurisdiction (i) to hear or determine claims arising under 15    the Workers' Compensation Act or the Workers' Occupational 16    Diseases Act, or claims for expenses in civil litigation, 17    or (ii) to review administrative decisions for which a 18    statute provides that review shall be in the circuit or 19    appellate court.20        (b) All claims against the State founded upon any 21    contract entered into with the State of Illinois.22        (c) All claims against the State for time unjustly 23    served in prisons of this State, in county jails, in   SB1621- 2 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1    county juvenile detention facilities, or Illinois Youth 2    Centers, on parole or probation, or registered as a sex 3    offender when the person unjustly convicted or adjudicated 4    a delinquent imprisoned received a pardon from the 5    Governor stating that such pardon is issued on the ground 6    of innocence of the crime for which he or she was convicted 7    or adjudicated a delinquent imprisoned or he or she 8    received a certificate of innocence from the Circuit Court 9    as provided in Section 2-702 of the Code of Civil 10    Procedure. For such claims, the court shall make an award 11    of $50,000 per year, and prorated for any partial year, 12    during which the person was wrongfully incarcerated in a 13    State prison, in a county jail, in a county juvenile 14    detention facility, or in an Illinois Youth Center, 15    including the time the person was incarcerated awaiting 16    trial, and $25,000 for each year, and prorated for any 17    partial year, during which the person was wrongfully on 18    parole or probation or required to register as a sex 19    offender. The court shall make an additional award of 20    reasonable attorney's fees, costs, and expenses in an 21    amount determined by the circuit court after awarding a 22    certificate of innocence under Section 2-702 of the Code 23    of Civil Procedure. The ; provided, the amount of the 24    award is at the discretion of the court; and provided, the 25    court shall make no award in excess of the following 26    amounts: for imprisonment of 5 years or less, not more   SB1621- 3 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1    than $85,350; for imprisonment of 14 years or less but 2    over 5 years, not more than $170,000; for imprisonment of 3    over 14 years, not more than $199,150; and provided 4    further, the court shall fix attorney's fees not to exceed 5    25% of the award granted. On or after the effective date of 6    this amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly, the 7    court shall annually adjust the maximum awards required 8    authorized by this subsection (c) to reflect the increase, 9    if any, in the Consumer Price Index For All Urban 10    Consumers for the previous calendar year, as determined by 11    the United States Department of Labor, except that no 12    annual increment may exceed 5%. For the annual 13    adjustments, if the Consumer Price Index decreases during 14    a calendar year, there shall be no adjustment for that 15    calendar year. The transmission by the Prisoner Review 16    Board or the clerk of the circuit court of the information 17    described in Section 11(b) to the clerk of the Court of 18    Claims is conclusive evidence of the validity of the 19    claim. The changes made by Public Act 95-970 this 20    amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly apply to all 21    claims pending on or filed on or after September 22, 2008 22    (the effective date of Public Act 95-970). The changes 23    made by this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly 24    apply to all claims pending or filed on or after the 25    effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 26    Assembly.   SB1621- 4 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1        (d) All claims against the State for damages in cases 2    sounding in tort, if a like cause of action would lie 3    against a private person or corporation in a civil suit, 4    and all like claims sounding in tort against the Medical 5    Center Commission, the Board of Trustees of the University 6    of Illinois, the Board of Trustees of Southern Illinois 7    University, the Board of Trustees of Chicago State 8    University, the Board of Trustees of Eastern Illinois 9    University, the Board of Trustees of Governors State 10    University, the Board of Trustees of Illinois State 11    University, the Board of Trustees of Northeastern Illinois 12    University, the Board of Trustees of Northern Illinois 13    University, the Board of Trustees of Western Illinois 14    University, or the Board of Trustees of the Illinois 15    Mathematics and Science Academy; provided, that an award 16    for damages in a case sounding in tort, other than certain 17    cases involving the operation of a State vehicle described 18    in this paragraph, shall not exceed the sum of $2,000,000 19    to or for the benefit of any claimant. The $2,000,000 20    limit prescribed by this Section does not apply to an 21    award of damages in any case sounding in tort arising out 22    of the operation by a State employee of a vehicle owned, 23    leased or controlled by the State. The defense that the 24    State or the Medical Center Commission or the Board of 25    Trustees of the University of Illinois, the Board of 26    Trustees of Southern Illinois University, the Board of   SB1621- 5 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1    Trustees of Chicago State University, the Board of 2    Trustees of Eastern Illinois University, the Board of 3    Trustees of Governors State University, the Board of 4    Trustees of Illinois State University, the Board of 5    Trustees of Northeastern Illinois University, the Board of 6    Trustees of Northern Illinois University, the Board of 7    Trustees of Western Illinois University, or the Board of 8    Trustees of the Illinois Mathematics and Science Academy 9    is not liable for the negligence of its officers, agents, 10    and employees in the course of their employment is not 11    applicable to the hearing and determination of such 12    claims. The changes to this Section made by this 13    amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly apply only to 14    claims filed on or after July 1, 2015.15        The court shall annually adjust the maximum awards 16    authorized by this subsection to reflect the increase, if 17    any, in the Consumer Price Index For All Urban Consumers 18    for the previous calendar year, as determined by the 19    United States Department of Labor. The Comptroller shall 20    make the new amount resulting from each annual adjustment 21    available to the public via the Comptroller's official 22    website by January 31 of every year. 23        (e) All claims for recoupment made by the State of 24    Illinois against any claimant.25        (f) All claims pursuant to the Line of Duty 26    Compensation Act. A claim under that Act must be heard and   SB1621- 6 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1    determined within one year after the application for that 2    claim is filed with the Court as provided in that Act. 3        (g) All claims filed pursuant to the Crime Victims 4    Compensation Act.5        (h) All claims pursuant to the Illinois National 6    Guardsman's Compensation Act. A claim under that Act must 7    be heard and determined within one year after the 8    application for that claim is filed with the Court as 9    provided in that Act. 10        (i) All claims authorized by subsection (a) of Section 11    10-55 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act for the 12    expenses incurred by a party in a contested case on the 13    administrative level.14(Source: P.A. 100-1124, eff. 11-27-18.) 15    (705 ILCS 505/11)  (from Ch. 37, par. 439.11)16    Sec. 11. Filing claims.17    (a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this 18Section and subsection (4) of Section 24, the claimant shall 19in all cases set forth fully in his petition the claim, the 20action thereon, if any, on behalf of the State, what persons 21are owners thereof or interested therein, when and upon what 22consideration such persons became so interested; that no 23assignment or transfer of the claim or any part thereof or 24interest therein has been made, except as stated in the 25petition; that the claimant is justly entitled to the amount   SB1621- 7 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1therein claimed from the State of Illinois, after allowing all 2just credits; and that claimant believes the facts stated in 3the petition to be true. The petition shall be verified, as to 4statements of facts, by the affidavit of the claimant, his 5agent, or attorney. 6    (b) Whenever a person has been convicted or adjudicated a 7delinquent served a term of imprisonment and has received a 8pardon by the Governor stating that such pardon was issued on 9the ground of innocence of the crime for which he or she was 10convicted or adjudicated a delinquent imprisoned, the Prisoner 11Review Board shall transmit this information to the clerk of 12the Court of Claims, together with the claimant's current 13address. Whenever a person has served a term of imprisonment 14and has received a certificate of innocence from the Circuit 15Court as provided in Section 2-702 of the Code of Civil 16Procedure, the clerk of the issuing Circuit Court shall 17transmit this information to the clerk of the Court of Claims, 18together with the claimant's current address. The clerk of the 19Court of Claims shall immediately docket the case for 20consideration by the Court of Claims, and shall provide notice 21to the claimant of such docketing together with all hearing 22dates and applicable deadlines. The Court of Claims shall hear 23the case and render a decision within 90 days after its 24docketing. 25(Source: P.A. 95-970, eff. 9-22-08; 96-328, eff. 8-11-09.)   SB1621- 8 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1    Section 10. The Code of Civil Procedure is amended by 2changing Section 2-702 as follows: 3    (735 ILCS 5/2-702)4    Sec. 2-702. Petition for a certificate of innocence that 5the petitioner was innocent of all offenses for which he or she 6was incarcerated.7    (a) The General Assembly finds and declares that innocent 8persons who have been wrongly convicted or adjudicated 9delinquent of crimes in Illinois and subsequently imprisoned 10have been frustrated in seeking legal redress due to a variety 11of substantive and technical obstacles in the law and that 12such persons should have an available avenue to obtain a 13finding of innocence so that they may obtain relief through a 14petition in the Court of Claims. The General Assembly further 15finds misleading the current legal nomenclature which compels 16an innocent person to seek a pardon for being wrongfully 17incarcerated. It is the intent of the General Assembly that 18the court, in exercising its discretion as permitted by law 19regarding the weight and admissibility of evidence submitted 20pursuant to this Section, shall, in the interest of justice, 21give due consideration to difficulties of proof caused by the 22passage of time, the death or unavailability of witnesses, the 23destruction of evidence or other factors not caused by such 24persons or those acting on their behalf.25    (b) Any person who was convicted or adjudicated a   SB1621- 9 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1delinquent and subsequently served any part of a sentence of 2incarceration in a State prison, in a county jail, in a county 3juvenile detention facility, or in an Illinois Youth Center, 4on parole or probation, or registered as a sex offender 5imprisoned for one or more felonies by the State of Illinois 6which he or she did not commit may, under the conditions 7hereinafter provided, file a petition for certificate of 8innocence in the circuit court of the county in which the 9person was convicted or adjudicated a delinquent. The petition 10shall request a certificate of innocence finding that the 11petitioner was innocent of one or more all offenses for which 12he or she was convicted or adjudicated a delinquent 13incarcerated.14    (c) In order to present the claim for certificate of 15innocence of an unjust conviction or juvenile delinquency 16adjudication and imprisonment, the petitioner must attach to 17his or her petition documentation demonstrating that:18        (1) he or she has been convicted or adjudicated a 19    delinquent of one or more felonies by the State of 20    Illinois and subsequently sentenced to a term of 21    imprisonment, and has served all or any part of the 22    sentence; and23        (2) his or her judgment of conviction or delinquency 24    adjudication was reversed or vacated, and the charge 25    indictment or information dismissed or, if a new trial was 26    ordered, either he or she was found not guilty at the new   SB1621- 10 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1    trial or he or she was not retried and the charge 2    indictment or information dismissed; or the statute, or 3    application thereof, on which the charge indictment or 4    information was based violated the Constitution of the 5    United States or the State of Illinois; and6        (3) his or her claim is not time barred by the 7    provisions of subsection (i) of this Section.8    (d) The petition shall state facts in sufficient detail to 9permit the court to find that the petitioner is likely to 10succeed at trial in proving that the petitioner is innocent of 11the alleged offenses for which he or she was convicted or 12adjudicated a delinquent charged in the indictment or 13information or his or her acts or omissions charged in the 14indictment or information did not constitute a felony or 15misdemeanor against the State of Illinois, and the petitioner 16did not by his or her own conduct voluntarily cause or bring 17about his or her conviction or juvenile delinquency 18adjudication. The petition shall be verified by the 19petitioner.20    (e) A copy of the petition shall be served on the Attorney 21General and the State's Attorney of the county where the 22conviction or juvenile delinquency adjudication was had. The 23Attorney General and the State's Attorney of the county where 24the conviction or juvenile delinquency adjudication was had 25shall have the right to intervene as parties.26    (f) In any hearing seeking a certificate of innocence, the   SB1621- 11 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1court may take judicial notice of prior sworn testimony or 2evidence admitted in the criminal or juvenile delinquency 3proceedings related to the convictions or adjudications which 4resulted in the alleged wrongful incarceration, if the 5petitioner was either represented by counsel at such prior 6proceedings or the right to counsel was knowingly waived.7    (g) In order to obtain a certificate of innocence the 8petitioner must prove by a preponderance of evidence that:9        (1) the petitioner was convicted or adjudicated a 10    delinquent of one or more felonies by the State of 11    Illinois and subsequently sentenced to a term of 12    imprisonment, and has served all or any part of the 13    sentence;14        (2)(A) the judgment of conviction or adjudication was 15    reversed or vacated, and the charge indictment or 16    information dismissed or, if a new trial was ordered, 17    either the petitioner was found not guilty at the new 18    trial or the petitioner was not retried and the charge 19    indictment or information dismissed; or (B) the statute, 20    or application thereof, on which the charge indictment or 21    information was based violated the Constitution of the 22    United States or the State of Illinois;23        (3) the petitioner is innocent of one or more of the 24    offenses for which he or she was convicted or adjudicated 25    a delinquent or his or her acts or omissions for which he 26    or she was convicted or adjudicated a delinquent charged   SB1621- 12 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1    in the indictment or information or his or her acts or 2    omissions charged in the indictment or information did not 3    constitute a felony or misdemeanor against the State; and4        (4) the petitioner did not by his or her own conduct 5    voluntarily cause or bring about his or her conviction or 6    juvenile delinquency adjudication.7    (h) If the court finds that the petitioner is entitled to a 8judgment, it shall enter a certificate of innocence finding 9that the petitioner was innocent of one or more all offenses 10for which he or she was convicted or adjudicated a delinquent. 11The court shall also make a determination, subject to proof by 12the claimant, of the reasonable attorney's fees, costs, and 13expenses incurred by the claimant in connection with obtaining 14the certificate of innocence under this Section incarcerated. 15Upon entry of the certificate of innocence or pardon from the 16Governor stating that such pardon was issued on the ground of 17innocence of the crime for which he or she was convicted or 18adjudicated a delinquent imprisoned, (1) the clerk of the 19court shall transmit a copy of the certificate of innocence to 20the clerk of the Court of Claims, together with the claimant's 21current address; and (2) the court shall enter an order 22expunging the record of arrest from the official records of 23the arresting authority and order that the records of the 24clerk of the circuit court and the Illinois State Police be 25sealed until further order of the court upon good cause shown 26or as otherwise provided herein, and the name of the defendant   SB1621- 13 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1or respondent in a juvenile delinquency proceeding obliterated 2from the official index requested to be kept by the circuit 3court clerk under Section 16 of the Clerks of Courts Act in 4connection with the arrest and conviction or delinquency 5adjudication for the offense but the order shall not affect 6any index issued by the circuit court clerk before the entry of 7the order. The court shall enter the expungement order 8regardless of whether the petitioner has prior criminal 9convictions or delinquency adjudications. 10    All records sealed by the Illinois State Police may be 11disseminated by the Department only as required by law or to 12the arresting authority, the State's Attorney, the court upon 13a later arrest for the same or similar offense, or for the 14purpose of sentencing for any subsequent felony. Upon 15conviction for any subsequent offense, the Department of 16Corrections shall have access to all sealed records of the 17Department pertaining to that individual. 18    Upon entry of the order of expungement, the clerk of the 19circuit court shall promptly mail a copy of the order to the 20person whose records were expunged and sealed. The clerk shall 21post in the common areas of the courthouse a notice containing 22information about grants for exonerated persons and their 23dependents under Section 62 of the Higher Education Student 24Assistance Act, including the Internet address of the Illinois 25Student Assistance Commission. The Illinois Student Assistance 26Commission shall develop a uniform statewide notice and   SB1621- 14 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1provide the format of the notice to each clerk. 2    (i) Any person seeking a certificate of innocence under 3this Section based on the dismissal of an indictment or 4information or acquittal that occurred before September 22, 52008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-970) this amendatory 6Act of the 95th General Assembly shall file his or her petition 7within 2 years after September 22, 2008 (the effective date of 8Public Act 95-970) this amendatory Act of the 95th General 9Assembly. Any person seeking a certificate of innocence under 10this Section based on the dismissal of an indictment or 11information or acquittal that occurred on or after September 1222, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-970) this 13amendatory Act of the 95th General Assembly shall file his or 14her petition within 2 years after the dismissal or acquittal. 15Any person seeking a certificate of innocence under this 16Section based on the dismissal of a juvenile delinquency 17petition or an acquittal on such petition that occurred before 18the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 19Assembly, including a petitioner whose petition was denied 20solely on the basis that this Section did not formerly apply to 21juvenile delinquency adjudications, shall file his or her 22petition within 4 years after the effective date of this 23amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly. Any person 24seeking a certificate of innocence under this Section based on 25the dismissal of a juvenile delinquency petition or an 26acquittal on such petition that occurred on or after the   SB1621- 15 -LRB104 07676 JRC 17720 b1effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 2Assembly shall file his or her petition within 2 years after 3the dismissal or acquittal.4    (j) The decision to grant or deny a certificate of 5innocence shall be binding only with respect to claims filed 6in the Court of Claims and shall not have a res judicata effect 7on any other proceedings.8(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 103-1046, eff. 1-1-25.) 9    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 10becoming law.